Illinois, session 104th, HB4298.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Children and Family Services Act is amended 5by adding Section 5c-1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 505/5c-1 new)7    Sec. 5c-1. Child protection investigator integrity.8    (a) Purpose. The purpose of this Section is to ensure that 9individuals with felony convictions are not assigned to child 10protective investigations or issued a Child Welfare Employee 11License (CWEL).12    (b) Prohibition. No person who has been convicted of any 13felony offense may:14        (1) hold a Child Welfare Employee License (CWEL);15        (2) perform child protection investigations; or16        (3) supervise investigation staff.17    (c) Background checks. 18        (1) All employees of the Department or a purchase of 19    service (POS) agency that contracts with the Department 20    who are employed to perform child welfare duties shall 21    undergo:22            (A) a fingerprint-based background check;23            (B) a statewide criminal history search; and  HB4298- 2 -LRB104 16911 KTG 30322 b1            (C) a Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal 2        history background check.3        (2) The background checks required under paragraph (1) 4    shall be repeated every 3 years during the employee's term 5    of employment.6    (d) Revocation of CWEL. The Department shall revoke a 7child welfare employee's CWEL immediately upon discovery that 8the employee has a felony conviction.9    (e) POS agency obligations. POS agencies that contract 10with the Department may not employ as a child welfare employee 11any person with a felon conviction. Any POS agency that 12violates this subsection is subject to: 13        (1) a civil penalty of $10,000 per violation;14        (2) contract termination; and15        (3) referral to the Attorney General for civil action. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 172, 2027.